Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
22-141.01
Hamilton.

The county of Hamilton is bounded as follows:
Beginning at the northeast meander corner of section 24, township 14 north,
range 5 west of the sixth principal meridian; thence south on the line dividing
ranges 4 and 5 west to a point on the line dividing townships 8 and 9 north;
thence west on the line dividing townships 8 and 9 north to a point on the
line dividing ranges 8 and 9 west; thence north on the line dividing ranges
8 and 9 west to the northwest corner of section 7, township 10 north, range
8 west; thence continuing north on the line dividing ranges 8 and 9 west on
a bearing of north 1 degree, 6 minutes, 39 seconds west a distance of 3963.32
feet to a point in the south channel of the Platte River; thence north 26
degrees, 16 minutes, 43 seconds east, 4477.82 feet; thence north 39 degrees,
25 minutes, 34 seconds east, 6937.24 feet; thence north 40 degrees, 17 minutes,
8 seconds east, 9415.04 feet; thence north 56 degrees, 16 minutes, 12 seconds
east, 3118.09 feet; thence north 33 degrees, 12 minutes, 56 seconds east,
5522.78 feet; thence north 45 degrees, 37 minutes, 50 seconds east, 3233.20
feet; thence north 55 degrees, 58 minutes, 45 seconds east, 12217.41 feet;
thence north 32 degrees, 21 minutes, 1 second east, 9051.98 feet; thence north
23 degrees, 37 minutes, 16 seconds east, 3540.46 feet; thence north 59 degrees,
9 minutes, 4 seconds east, 4326.45 feet; thence north 51 degrees, 17 minutes,
37 seconds east, 11127.53 feet; thence south 39 degrees, 36 minutes, 35 seconds
east, 464.59 feet; thence north 69 degrees, 18 minutes, 17 seconds east, 1452.28
feet; thence north 55 degrees, 51 minutes, 51 seconds east, 430.40 feet; thence
south 77 degrees, 28 minutes, 17 seconds east, 528.85 feet; thence north 79
degrees, 21 minutes, 55 seconds east, 703.44 feet; thence north 27 degrees,
24 minutes, 27 seconds east, 367.28 feet; thence north 41 degrees, 50 minutes,
18 seconds east, 1122.47 feet; thence north 19 degrees, 40 minutes, 41 seconds
east, 484.15 feet; thence north 41 degrees, 23 minutes, 30 seconds east, 474.86
feet; thence north 25 degrees, 6 minutes, 30 seconds west, 474.90 feet; thence
north 68 degrees, 41 minutes, 38 seconds east, 2605.28 feet; thence north
38 degrees, 57 minutes, 26 seconds east, 9143.17 feet; thence north 57 degrees,
14 minutes, 34 seconds east, 5953.39 feet; thence north 50 degrees, 23 minutes,
34 seconds east, 2012.96 feet; thence north 35 degrees, 48 minutes, 29 seconds
east, 1723 feet; thence north 25 degrees, 20 minutes, 59 seconds east, 3001.08
feet; thence north 39 degrees, 17 minutes, 44 seconds east, 2592.82 feet;
thence north 27 degrees, 22 minutes, 47 seconds east, 2701.44 feet; thence
north 52 degrees, 49 minutes, 38 seconds east, 3343.12 feet; thence north
59 degrees, 44 minutes, 14 seconds east, 9560.61 feet; thence south 28 degrees,
46 minutes, 42 seconds east, 2145.07 feet; thence north 54 degrees, 22 minutes,
14 seconds east, 1262.88 feet; thence north 64 degrees, 12 minutes, 47 seconds
east, 2172.54 feet; thence north 75 degrees, 0 minutes, 21 seconds east, 3411.91
feet; thence north 57 degrees, 50 minutes, 44 seconds east, 6229.53 feet;
thence north 69 degrees, 35 minutes, 2 seconds east, 3924.66 feet; thence
north 60 degrees, 34 minutes, 32 seconds east, 7862.89 feet; thence north
41 degrees, 43 minutes, 47 seconds east, 2178.62 feet; thence north 47 degrees,
29 minutes, 27 seconds east, 2293.19 feet; thence north 20 degrees, 33 minutes,
22 seconds east, 1357.03 feet; thence north 37 degrees, 36 minutes, 34 seconds
east, 10909.57 feet; thence north 29 degrees, 57 minutes, 43 seconds east,
10064.70 feet; thence south 1 degree, 57 minutes, 32 seconds east, 987.20
feet to the point of beginning. Note all bearings are based on state plane
coordinates used for Merrick and Hamilton Counties. All distances are converted
to ground.

Laws 2011, LB556, § 1.